test/data/listyaml/V-list_4st_ad_gt-norm.gen.yaml
    iätáduddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: iätádudâm
    piruluddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pirulud
    tohâluddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tohâludâm
    pivâstuddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pivâstudâm
    majettuddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: majettudâm
    skilottuddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skilottudâm
    liävuttuddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: liävuttudâm
    mášuttuddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: mášuttudâm
    čájádâddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čájádâdâm
    jámálgâddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jámálgâd
    jurmâgâddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jurmâgâd
    hástálâddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hástálâd
    kuldâlâddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuldâlâdâm
    posâlâddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: posâlâd
    arvâlâddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: arvâlâdâm
    alanâddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: alanâd
    kobdánâddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kobdánâd
    ájánâddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ájánâd
    puáránâddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: puáránâdâm
    luoddânâddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: luoddânâd
    loigânâddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: loigânâd
    skirvânâddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skirvânâd
    patârâddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: patârâd
    ruáhásâddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ruáhásâdâm
    kákkásâddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kákkásâd
    riäčásâddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: riäčásâd
    porfâsâddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: porfâsâdâm
    vieggâsâddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vieggâsâdâm
    muijâsâddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: muijâsâdâm
    kokkâsâddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kokkâsâdâm
    faškâsâddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: faškâsâd
    jurmâsâddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jurmâsâd
    korppâsâddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: korppâsâdâm
    kaivâsâddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kaivâsâdâm
    ucástâddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ucástâdâm
    tabadâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tabadâlâm
    haddadâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: haddadâlâm
    aldadâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: aldadâlâm
    pajadâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pajadâlâm
    askadâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: askadâlâm
    pirundâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pirundâlâm
    komárdâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: komárdâlâm
    hámárdâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hámárdâlâm
    vaigârdâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vaigârdâlâm
    suogârdâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: suogârdâlâm
    kiemârdâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kiemârdâlâm
    visârdâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: visârdâlâm
    čuáskudâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuáskudâlâm
    fáškudâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: fáškudâlâm
    párudâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: párudâl
    viärdádâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: viärdádâlâm
    hávdádâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hávdádâlâm
    huhkádâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: huhkádâlâm
    sivnádâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sivnádâlâm
    sánádâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sánádâlâm
    kámppádâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kámppádâlâm
    iäpádâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: iäpádâlâm
    puárádâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: puárádâlâm
    išádâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: išádâlâm
    ráđádâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ráđádâlâm
    kiäčádâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kiäčádâlâm
    ruhâdâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ruhâdâlâm
    koijâdâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: koijâdâlâm
    kietâdâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kietâdâlâm
    vannaastâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vannaastâlâm
    hadastâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hadastâlâm
    nabdastâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nabdastâlâm
    cagastâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: cagastâl
    cagastâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: cagastâlâm
    ihastâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ihastâlâm
    valastâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: valastâlâm
    teltastâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: teltastâlâm
    rähistâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: rähistâlâm
    luoddiistâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: luoddiistâlâm
    ceggiistâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ceggiistâlâm
    pieggiistâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pieggiistâlâm
    njurgiistâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njurgiistâlâm
    spohhiistâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: spohhiistâlâm
    viekkiistâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: viekkiistâlâm
    tikkiistâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tikkiistâlâm
    vuorkkiistâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vuorkkiistâlâm
    kolliistâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kolliistâlâm
    lavliistâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: lavliistâlâm
    juvliistâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: juvliistâlâm
    orniistâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: orniistâlâm
    pasniistâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pasniistâlâm
    varriistâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: varriistâlâm
    sierriistâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sierriistâlâm
    korriistâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: korriistâlâm
    hilttiistâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hilttiistâlâm
    čarviistâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čarviistâlâm
    kuvviistâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuvviistâlâm
    ađđiistâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ađđiistâlâm
    korristâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: korristâlâm
    ujostâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ujostâlâm
    pijpostâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pijpostâlâm
    orostâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: orostâlâm
    čorostâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čorostâlâm
    herskustâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: herskustâlâm
    pálustâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pálustâlâm
    tálustâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tálustâlâm
    iälustâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: iälustâlâm
    sápustâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sápustâlâm
    njuárustâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njuárustâlâm
    rantustâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: rantustâl
    rantustâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: rantustâlâm
    punnjuustâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: punnjuustâl
    punnjuustâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: punnjuustâlâm
    lijkkuustâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: lijkkuustâlâm
    kiškuustâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kiškuustâlâm
    rammuustâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: rammuustâlâm
    lappuustâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: lappuustâlâm
    šiettuustâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: šiettuustâlâm
    havvuustâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: havvuustâlâm
    raiđuustâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: raiđuustâlâm
    mávustâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: mávustâl
    mávustâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: mávustâlâm
    tiäđustâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tiäđustâlâm
    čibástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čibástâlâm
    nijbástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nijbástâlâm
    nuáidástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nuáidástâlâm
    njálgástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njálgástâlâm
    irgástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: irgástâlâm
    piälhástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: piälhástâlâm
    mohástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: mohástâlâm
    ávhástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ávhástâlâm
    ráhástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ráhástâlâm
    miähástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: miähástâlâm
    julástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: julástâlâm
    málástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: málástâlâm
    kiälástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kiälástâlâm
    hirmástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hirmástâlâm
    hánástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hánástâlâm
    stuárástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: stuárástâlâm
    hiärástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hiärástâlâm
    vijsástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vijsástâlâm
    kuásástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuásástâlâm
    muátástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: muátástâl
    muštástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: muštástâlâm
    káhvástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: káhvástâlâm
    kijvástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kijvástâlâm
    tálvástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tálvástâlâm
    siärvástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: siärvástâlâm
    uvástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: uvástâlâm
    koccáástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: koccáástâlâm
    várdáástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: várdáástâl
    várdáástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: várdáástâlâm
    ovdâháástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ovdáháástâlâm
    ovdâháástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ovdâháástâlâm
    uhkáástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: uhkáástâlâm
    čokkáástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čokkáástâlâm
    livkkáástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: livkkáástâlâm
    fáškáástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: fáškáástâlâm
    uináástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: uináástâlâm
    spirppáástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: spirppáástâlâm
    liässáástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: liässáástâlâm
    piäittáástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: piäittáástâlâm
    nurváástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nurváástâlâm
    uáđđáástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: uáđđáástâlâm
    vižástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vižástâlâm
    mučástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: mučástâlâm
    sovčástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sovčástâl
    kuáđástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuáđástâlâm
    tubdâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tubdâstâlâm
    sodâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sodâstâl
    sodâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sodâstâlâm
    nurdâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nurdâstâlâm
    agâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: agâstâl
    agâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: agâstâlâm
    ciegâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ciegâstâl
    čuoigâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuoigâstâlâm
    kuhâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuhâstâlâm
    nuhâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nuhâstâlâm
    ávhâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ávhâstâlâm
    kejâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kejâstâlâm
    ijâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ijâstâlâm
    puáimálâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: puáimálâstâlâm
    njomâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njomâstâlâm
    mainâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: mainâstâlâm
    čierâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čierâstâlâm
    irâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: irâstâlâm
    leirâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: leirâstâlâm
    korâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: korâstâlâm
    usâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: usâstâlâm
    smietâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: smietâstâlâm
    suotâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: suotâstâlâm
    kavâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kavâstâlâm
    savâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: savâstâlâm
    povvâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: povvâstâlâm
    lađâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: lađâstâlâm
    povčâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: povčâstâlâm
    paldattâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: paldattâlâm
    kašnattâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kašnattâlâm
    karvattâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: karvattâl
    addiittâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: addiittâl
    addiittâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: addiittâlâm
    piergiittâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: piergiittâlâm
    sahhiittâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sahhiittâlâm
    cuovkkiittâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: cuovkkiittâlâm
    hammiittâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hammiittâlâm
    fierriittâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: fierriittâlâm
    vierriittâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vierriittâlâm
    šlaaviittâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: šlaaviittâlâm
    heiviittâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: heiviittâlâm
    skirviittâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skirviittâlâm
    ruŋŋiittâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ruŋŋiittâlâm
    njurgottâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njurgottâlâm
    čokottâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čokottâlâm
    oskottâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: oskottâlâm
    almottâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: almottâlâm
    fijnottâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: fijnottâlâm
    pisottâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pisottâlâm
    kištottâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kištottâlâm
    muštottâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: muštottâlâm
    važottâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: važottâlâm
    cuápcuttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: cuápcuttâl
    cuápcuttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: cuápcuttâlâm
    surguttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: surguttâlâm
    náguttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: náguttâlâm
    hárjuttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hárjuttâlâm
    herskuttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: herskuttâlâm
    hávskuttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hávskuttâlâm
    čuáskuttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuáskuttâlâm
    láškuttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: láškuttâlâm
    čiävluttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čiävluttâlâm
    viäluttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: viäluttâlâm
    lášmuttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: lášmuttâlâm
    sárnuttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sárnuttâlâm
    háputtâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: háputtâlâm
    piruttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: piruttâlâm
    vuáruttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vuáruttâlâm
    kuásuttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuásuttâlâm
    tuálvuttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tuálvuttâlâm
    uávuttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: uávuttâlâm
    siäđuttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: siäđuttâlâm
    sundáttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sundáttâlâm
    kuádáttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuádáttâlâm
    jorgáttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jorgáttâl
    jorgáttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jorgáttâlâm
    hurgáttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hurgáttâlâm
    nágáttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nágáttâlâm
    huiháttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: huiháttâlâm
    muálháttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: muálháttâlâm
    piälháttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: piälháttâlâm
    jáháttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jáháttâlâm
    jiäháttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jiäháttâlâm
    ájáttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ájáttâlâm
    čájáttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čájáttâlâm
    noskáttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: noskáttâlâm
    čovláttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čovláttâlâm
    himáttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: himáttâlâm
    jiänáttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jiänáttâlâm
    čáráttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čáráttâlâm
    kiäsáttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kiäsáttâlâm
    ráváttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ráváttâlâm
    riäváttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: riäváttâlâm
    pozáttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pozáttâl
    pozáttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pozáttâlâm
    máttááttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: máttááttâlâm
    áhčááttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: áhčááttâlâm
    valdâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: valdâttâlâm
    suorgâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suorgâttâl
    suorgâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: suorgâttâlâm
    lihâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: lihâttâlâm
    muhâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: muhâttâlâm
    šlajâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: šlajâttâlâm
    punjâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: punjâttâlâm
    hokâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hokâttâlâm
    časkâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: časkâttâlâm
    kuoskâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuoskâttâlâm
    omâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: omâttâlâm
    kumâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kumâttâlâm
    monâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: monâttâlâm
    vonâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vonâttâlâm
    suunâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: suunâttâlâm
    parâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: parâttâlâm
